Washington statutes.
RCW 10.21.030

Conditions of release—Judicial officer may amend order.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1596-S.SL) ***

(1) The judicial officer in any felony, misdemeanor, or gross misdemeanor case may at any time amend the order to impose additional or different conditions of release. The conditions imposed under this chapter supplement but do not supplant provisions of law allowing the imposition of conditions to assure the appearance of the defendant at trial or to prevent interference with the administration of justice.

(2) Appropriate conditions of release under this chapter include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) The defendant may be placed in the custody of a pretrial release program;

(b) The defendant may have restrictions placed upon travel, association, or place of abode during the period of release;

(c) The defendant may be required to comply with a specified curfew;

(d) The defendant may be required to return to custody during specified hours or to be placed on electronic monitoring, as defined in RCW 9.94A.030, if available. The defendant, if convicted, may not have the period of incarceration reduced by the number of days spent on electronic monitoring;

(e) The defendant may be required to comply with a program of home detention. For a felony offense, home detention is defined in RCW 9.94A.030;

(f) The defendant may be prohibited from approaching or communicating in any manner with particular persons or classes of persons;

(g) The defendant may be prohibited from going to certain geographical areas or premises;

(h) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing any dangerous weapons or firearms;

(i) The defendant may be prohibited from possessing or consuming any intoxicating liquors or drugs not prescribed to the defendant. The defendant may be required to submit to testing to determine the defendant's compliance with this condition;

(j) The defendant may be prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition interlock device;

(k) The defendant may be required to report regularly to and remain under the supervision of an officer of the court or other person or agency; and

(l) The defendant may be prohibited from committing any violations of criminal law.

[ 2018 c 276 s 4; 2015 c 287 s 5; 2014 c 24 s 2; 2010 c 254 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2018 c 276: See note following RCW 10.21.015.

Intent—Contingent effective date—2010 c 254: See notes following RCW 10.21.010.